Indiana, session 2026, HB1148.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-7-13-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. Notwithstanding section 10 of this chapter, an
individual may register on the day of a primary, general,
municipal, school district, or special election as provided in
IC 3-7-49.
SECTION 2. IC 3-7-13-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) A person An
individual desiring to register or transfer a registration may do so at the
office of the circuit court clerk or board of registration through the
close of business on the twenty-ninth day before the election is
scheduled to occur.
(b) An individual desiring to register may do so on the day of a
primary, general, municipal, school district, or special election as
provided in IC 3-7-49.
SECTION 3. IC 3-7-36-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.76-2014,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) This section applies to a person described
in subsection (b) who applies to register to vote during the period:
(1) beginning on the seventh day before election day; and
(2) ending at noon election day.
(b) An absent uniformed services voter who is absent from Indiana
during the registration period applicable to the voter under this chapter
and who otherwise would be entitled to register to vote under Indiana
law may, upon returning to Indiana during the period described in
subsection (a) following discharge from service or reassignment,
register to vote by doing the following:
(1) Showing either of the following to the county voter
registration office:
(A) A discharge from service, dated not earlier than the
beginning of the registration period that ended on the eighth
day before election day, of:
(i) the voter;
(ii) the voter's spouse; or
(iii) the individual of whom the voter is a dependent.
(B) A copy of the government movement orders, with a
reporting date not earlier than the beginning of the registration
period that ended on the eighth day before election day, of:
(i) the voter;
(ii) the voter's spouse; or
(iii) the individual of whom the voter is a dependent.
(2) Completing a registration affidavit.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (g), a voter who registers
under this section may vote at the upcoming election only by absentee
ballot at the office of the circuit court clerk at the time the voter
registers under this section or at any time after the voter registers under
this section and before noon on election day. A voter who wants to vote
under this subsection must do both of the following:
(1) Complete an application for an absentee ballot.
(2) Sign an affidavit that the voter has not voted at any other
precinct in the election.
The voter may vote at subsequent elections as otherwise provided in
this title.
(d) If the voter votes by absentee ballot under this section, the
circuit court clerk shall do the following:
(1) Certify in writing that the voter registered under this section.
(2) Attach the certification to the voter's absentee ballot envelope.
(e) If the county has a board of registration, the board of registration
shall promptly deliver the voter's registration affidavit to the circuit
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


court clerk to permit the voter to vote under subsection (c).
(f) If the voter chooses not to vote under subsection (c), the county
voter registration office shall register the voter on the first day of the
next registration period.
(g) An individual described in subsection (b) may register and
vote on the day of a primary, general, municipal, school district, or
special election as provided in IC 3-7-49.
SECTION 4. IC 3-7-48-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.271-2013,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as otherwise provided by NVRA or
in this chapter, a person whose name does not appear on the
registration record may not vote, unless:
(1) the county voter registration office issues a signed certificate
of error immediately available for inspection in the county voter
registration office showing that the voter is legally registered in
the precinct where the voter resides; or
(2) the voter has registered as provided in IC 3-7-49.
(b) A person whose name does not appear on the registration record
may cast a provisional ballot as provided in IC 3-11.7.
SECTION 5. IC 3-7-49 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 49. Election Day Registration
Sec. 1. (a) An individual who is not registered to vote but is
otherwise qualified to vote shall be allowed to vote at the polls in a
primary, general, municipal, school district, or special election if
the individual registers at the polls under this chapter.
(b) To register to vote at the polls under this chapter, an
individual:
(1) must be a resident of the precinct;
(2) must be otherwise legally qualified to vote under
IC 3-7-13-1;
(3) may not be registered to vote under IC 3-7-14 through
IC 3-7-22;
(4) may not be qualified to vote under IC 3-7-39-7,
IC 3-7-39-8, IC 3-7-48, IC 3-10-10, IC 3-10-11, or IC 3-10-12;
and
(5) may not have already voted in the election.
(c) An individual who wishes to register to vote under this
chapter must do the following:
(1) Complete a voter registration form prescribed by
IC 3-7-18.
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


(2) Provide acceptable proof of residence.
Sec. 2. (a) An individual may comply with the proof of residence
requirement under section 1(c) of this chapter only by providing a
REAL ID driver's license or identification card (as defined in 6
CFR 37.3) that shows the name and residence address of the
individual registering to vote.
(b) If an individual presents a document under subsection (a),
the poll clerk shall add a notation to the poll list indicating the type
of document presented by the individual. The election division shall
prescribe a standardized coding system to classify documents
presented under subsection (a) for entry into the county voter
registration system.
(c) If an individual is unable to present the documentation
required under subsection (a) to the poll clerk while present at the
polls, the poll clerk shall notify the precinct election board.
(d) The precinct election board shall advise an individual
described in subsection (c) that the individual must file a copy of
the documentation required under subsection (a) with:
(1) the county voter registration office; or
(2) the precinct election board in the voter's precinct;
to permit the individual's provisional ballot to be counted under
IC 3-11.7.
Sec. 3. An individual who registers to vote under this chapter:
(1) may not be challenged on the grounds that the individual's
registration does not appear in the precinct registration book
or poll list; and
(2) is not required to obtain a certificate of error under
IC 3-7-48 to vote.
Sec. 4. Before each primary, general, municipal, school district,
or special election, the county election board shall provide each
precinct election board with a sufficient number of registration
forms to meet the reasonable need for the forms under this
chapter.
Sec. 5. The precinct election board shall attach the completed
registration forms to the poll list for processing by the county voter
registration office under IC 3-10-1-31.1.
Sec. 6. (a) The precinct election board shall add to the poll list
of the precinct the name and address of an individual who registers
to vote under this chapter.
(b) The county voter registration office shall add to the
registration record of the county the name of an individual who
registers to vote under this chapter.
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


Sec. 7. The county voter registration office shall process under
IC 3-7-33-5 the voter registration forms completed under section
1 of this chapter.
Sec. 8. If a notice mailed under IC 3-7-33-5 to an individual who
registered under this chapter is returned as undeliverable, the
county voter registration office shall initiate steps under
IC 3-7-33-6 to remove the individual from the registration rolls.
Sec. 9. A registration completed under this chapter for which
the notice mailed under IC 3-7-33-5 is not returned is effective to
the same extent as if the registration had been completed under
IC 3-7-14 through IC 3-7-22.
Sec. 10. An individual who registers to vote under this chapter
shall be given a provisional ballot to vote at the election if the
individual wishes to vote at that election.
SECTION 6. IC 3-10-8-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.10-2010,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) If the special election occurs during the
period when registration is open under IC 3-7-13, the registration
period continues through the twenty-ninth day before the special
election occurs and resumes on the date specified by IC 3-7-13-10(d),
except that an individual may register on the day of a special
election as provided in IC 3-7-49.
(b) The election board conducting the special election shall provide
poll lists for use at the precincts that include the names of voters in the
precinct who:
(1) have registered through the twenty-ninth day before the
special election is to be conducted; or
(2) are absent uniformed services voters or overseas voters
registered under IC 3-7-36.
(c) This subsection applies when a special election is ordered by a
court under IC 3-12-8-17 or the state recount commission under
IC 3-12-11-18. A candidate may not be placed on the special election
ballot unless the candidate was on the ballot or was a declared write-in
candidate for the office at the general election preceding the special
election.
SECTION 7. IC 3-11-8-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.153-2024,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) Only the following persons are permitted
in the polls during an election:
(1) Members of a precinct election board.
(2) Poll clerks and assistant poll clerks.
(3) Election sheriffs.
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


(4) Deputy election commissioners.
(5) Pollbook holders and challengers.
(6) Watchers.
(7) Voters for the purposes of:
(A) voting; or
(B) registering to vote on election day under IC 3-7-49, or
filing a copy of the documentation required by IC 3-7-49-2
with the precinct election board in the voter's precinct so
that the voter's provisional ballot may be counted under
IC 3-11.7.
(8) Minor children accompanying voters as provided under
IC 3-11-11-8.
(9) An assistant to a precinct election officer appointed under
IC 3-6-6-39.
(10) An individual authorized to assist a voter in accordance with
IC 3-11-9.
(11) A member of a county election board, acting on behalf of the
board.
(12) A technician authorized to act on behalf of a county election
board to repair a voting system (if the technician bears credentials
signed by each member of the board).
(13) Either of the following who have been issued credentials
signed by the members of the county election board:
(A) The county chairman of a political party.
(B) The county vice chairman of a political party.
However, a county chairman or a county vice chairman who is a
candidate for nomination or election to office at the election may
not enter the polls under this subdivision.
(14) The secretary of state, as chief election officer of the state,
unless the individual serving as secretary of state is a candidate
for nomination or election to an office at the election.
(15) A person credentialed by the Indiana protection and
advocacy services commission to conduct activities for the
protection and advocacy for voting access program provided
under 52 U.S.C. 21061.
(b) Except for an individual described in subsection (a)(8) or
(a)(10), an individual must be a citizen of the United States to be
permitted in the polls during an election.
(c) The secretary of state may exempt an individual from the
requirement to be a United States citizen.
(d) This subsection applies to a simulated election for minors
conducted with the authorization of the county election board. An
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


individual participating in the simulated election may be in the polls for
the purpose of voting. A person supervising the simulated election may
be in the polls to perform the supervision.
(e) The inspector of a precinct has authority over all simulated
election activities conducted under subsection (d) and shall ensure that
the simulated election activities do not interfere with the election
conducted in that polling place.
(f) A person described in subsection (a)(15) must carry an
identification card that clearly states the following:
(1) The name of the individual carrying the identification card.
(2) A statement that the person is credentialed by the Indiana
protection and advocacy services commission to enter the polling
location.
(3) A brief statement that the individual is conducting activities
provided under federal law.
SECTION 8. IC 3-11-8-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. A person may not remain within a distance
equal to the length of the chute (as defined in IC 3-5-2.1-21) of the
entrance to the polls except for the purpose of:
(1) offering to vote; or
(2) registering to vote on election day under IC 3-7-49, or
filing a copy of the documentation required by IC 3-7-49-2
with the precinct election board in the voter's precinct so that
the voter's provisional ballot may be counted under IC 3-11.7.
SECTION 9. IC 3-11-8-25.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25.1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (e), a
voter who desires to vote an official ballot at an election shall provide
proof of identification.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (e), before the voter proceeds
to vote in the election, a precinct election officer shall ask the voter to
provide proof of identification. One (1) of each of the precinct election
officers nominated by each county chairman of a major political party
of the county under IC 3-6-6-8 or IC 3-6-6-9 is entitled to ask the voter
to provide proof of identification. The voter shall produce the proof of
identification to each precinct officer requesting the proof of
identification before being permitted to sign the poll list.
(c) If:
(1) the voter is unable or declines to present the proof of
identification; or
(2) a member of the precinct election board determines that the
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


proof of identification provided by the voter does not qualify as
proof of identification under IC 3-5-2.1-84;
a member of the precinct election board shall challenge the voter as
prescribed by this chapter.
(d) If the voter executes a challenged voter's affidavit under section
22.1 of this chapter, the voter shall:
(1) sign the poll list; and
(2) receive a provisional ballot.
(e) A voter who votes in person at a precinct polling place, vote
center, or satellite office established under IC 3-11-10-26.3 that is
located at a state licensed care facility where the voter resides is not
required to provide proof of identification before voting in an election.
(f) After a voter has passed the challengers or has been sworn in, the
voter shall be instructed by a member of the precinct election board to
proceed to the location where the poll clerks are stationed. In a vote
center county using an electronic poll list, two (2) election officers who
are not members of the same political party must be present when a
voter signs in on the electronic poll list. The voter shall announce the
voter's name to the poll clerks or assistant poll clerks the voter's name
and whether the voter wants to register to vote at the polls. If the
voter wants to register and meets the conditions set forth in
IC 3-7-49, the poll clerk or other precinct election officer shall
register the voter in accordance with IC 3-7-49. If the voter is
already registered, a poll clerk, an assistant poll clerk, or a member
of the precinct election board shall require the voter to write the
following on the poll list or to provide the following information for
entry into the electronic poll list:
(1) The voter's name.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (k), the voter's current
residence address.
(g) The poll clerk, an assistant poll clerk, or a member of the
precinct election board shall:
(1) ask the voter to provide or update the voter's voter
identification number;
(2) tell the voter the number the voter may use as a voter
identification number; and
(3) explain to the voter that the voter is not required to provide or
update a voter identification number at the polls.
(h) The poll clerk, an assistant poll clerk, or a member of the
precinct election board shall ask the voter to provide proof of
identification.
(i) In case of doubt concerning a voter's identity, the precinct
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


election board shall compare the voter's signature with the signature on
the voter's registration record provided by the county voter registration
office under IC 3-7-29. If the board determines that the voter's
signature is authentic, the voter may then vote. If either poll clerk
doubts the voter's identity following comparison of the signatures, the
poll clerk shall challenge the voter in the manner prescribed by section
21 of this chapter.
(j) If:
(1) the poll clerk does not execute a challenger's affidavit; or
(2) the voter executes a challenged voter's affidavit under section
22.1 of this chapter or executed the affidavit before signing the
poll list;
the voter may then vote.
(k) The electronic poll book (or each line on a poll list sheet
provided to take a voter's current address) must include a box under the
heading "Address Unchanged". A voter whose address is unchanged
shall check the box instead of writing the voter's current address on the
poll list, or if an electronic poll book is used, the poll clerk shall check
the box after stating to the voter the address shown on the electronic
poll book and receiving an oral affirmation from the voter that the
voter's residence address shown on the poll list is the voter's current
residence address instead of writing the voter's current residence
address on the poll list or reentering the address in the electronic poll
book.
(l) If the voter indicates that the voter's current residence is located
within another county in Indiana, the voter is considered to have
directed the county voter registration office of the county where the
precinct is located to cancel the voter registration record within the
county. The precinct election board shall provide the voter with a voter
registration application for the voter to complete and file with the
county voter registration office of the county where the voter's current
residence address is located.
(m) If the voter indicates that the voter's current residence is located
outside Indiana, the voter is considered to have directed the county
voter registration office of the county where the precinct is located to
cancel the voter registration record within the county.
SECTION 10. IC 3-11-8-25.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.271-2013,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25.5. (a) If an individual signs the individual's
name and either:
(1) signs the individual's address; or
(2) checks the "Address Unchanged" box;
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


on the poll list or provides the information for entry by the poll clerk
into the electronic poll list under section 25.1 of this chapter and then
leaves the polls without casting a ballot or after casting a provisional
ballot, the voter may not be permitted to reenter the polls, to cast a
ballot at the election. except as provided by subsection (b).
(b) An individual who:
(1) registers to vote on election day under IC 3-7-49; and
(2) is unable to present the documentation required under
IC 3-7-49-2;
is entitled to reenter the polls solely to file a copy of the
documentation required under IC 3-7-49-2 with the precinct
election board in the individual's precinct so that the individual's
provisional ballot may be counted under IC 3-11.7.
SECTION 11. IC 3-11.7-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2024,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As provided by 52 U.S.C. 21082, This
section applies to the following individuals:
(1) An individual:
(A) whose name does not appear on the registration list; and
(B) who is challenged under IC 3-10-1 or IC 3-11-8 after the
voter makes an oral or a written affirmation under IC 3-7-48-5
or IC 3-7-48-7 or after the voter produces a certificate of error
under IC 3-7-48-1.
(2) An individual described by IC 3-10-1-10.5, IC 3-11-8-23.5, or
IC 3-11-8-27.5 who is challenged as not eligible to vote.
(3) An individual who seeks to vote in an election as a result of a
court order (or any other order) extending the time established for
closing the polls under IC 3-11-8-8.
(4) An individual who is registering to vote at the polls under
IC 3-7-49.
(b) As required by 52 U.S.C. 21083, A voter who has registered to
vote but has not:
(1) presented identification required under 52 U.S.C. 21083 to the
poll clerk before voting in person under IC 3-11-8-25.1; or
(2) filed a copy of the identification required under 52 U.S.C.
21083 to the county voter registration office before the voter's
absentee ballot is cast;
is entitled to vote a provisional ballot under this article.
(c) A voter who has registered to vote but has not:
(1) presented documentation required under IC 3-7-33-4.7 to the
poll clerk before voting in person; or
(2) filed a copy of the identification required under IC 3-7-33-4.7
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


with the county voter registration office before the voter's
absentee ballot is cast;
is entitled to vote a provisional ballot under this article.
(d) A voter who has registered to vote under IC 3-7-49 is
entitled to vote a provisional ballot under this article.
(d) (e) A precinct election officer shall inform an individual
described by subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2) that the individual may cast a
provisional ballot if the individual:
(1) is eligible to vote under IC 3-7-13-1;
(2) submitted a voter registration application during the
registration period described by IC 3-7-13-10; and
(3) executes an affidavit described in IC 3-10-1-9 or IC 3-11-8-23.
(e) (f) A precinct election officer shall inform an individual
described by subsection (a)(3) or (a)(4) that the individual may cast a
provisional ballot.
SECTION 12. IC 3-11.7-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2024,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in section 5 of this
chapter, if the county election board determines that all the following
apply, a provisional ballot is valid and shall be counted under this
chapter:
(1) The affidavit executed by the provisional voter under
IC 3-11.7-2-1 is properly executed.
(2) The provisional voter is a qualified voter of the precinct and
has provided proof of identification, if required, under IC 3-10-1,
IC 3-11-8, or IC 3-11-10-26.
(3) Based on all the information available to the county election
board, including:
(A) information provided by the provisional voter;
(B) information contained in the county's voter registration
records; and
(C) information contained in the statewide voter registration
file;
the provisional voter registered to vote at a registration agency
under this article on a date within the registration period.
(b) If the provisional voter has provided information regarding the
registration agency where the provisional voter registered to vote, the
board shall promptly make an inquiry to the agency regarding the
alleged registration. The agency shall respond to the board not later
than noon of the first Friday after the election, indicating whether the
agency's records contain any information regarding the registration. If
the agency does not respond to the board's inquiry, or if the agency
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


responds that the agency has no record of the alleged registration, the
board shall reject the provisional ballot. The board shall endorse the
ballot with the word "Rejected" and document on the ballot the inquiry
and response, if any, by the agency.
(c) Except as provided in section 5 of this chapter, a provisional
ballot cast by a voter described in IC 3-11.7-2-1(b) is valid and shall be
counted if the county election board determines under this article that
the voter filed the documentation required under IC 3-7-33-4.5 and 52
U.S.C. 21083 with the county voter registration office not later than the
closing of the polls on election day.
(d) Except as provided in section 5 of this chapter, a provisional
ballot cast by a voter described in IC 3-11.7-2-1(c) is valid and shall be
counted if the county election board determines under this article that
the voter filed the documentation required under IC 3-7-33-4.7 with the
county voter registration office not later than the closing of the polls on
election day.
(e) Except as provided in section 5 of this chapter, a provisional
ballot cast by a provisional voter described in IC 3-11.7-2-1(d) is
valid and shall be counted if the county election board determines
the following:
(1) The provisional voter completed a voter registration form
under IC 3-7-49-1(c).
(2) The notice mailed under IC 3-7-33-5 to the provisional
voter has not been returned as undeliverable.
(3) The provisional voter is a qualified voter of the precinct.
(4) The provisional voter has done all of the following not
later than the closing of the polls on election day:
(A) Provided proof of residence acceptable under IC 3-7-49
to the:
(i) poll clerk;
(ii) county voter registration office; or
(iii) precinct election board in the voter's precinct.
(B) If required, provided:
(i) proof of identification under IC 3-10-1, IC 3-11-8, or
IC 3-11-10-26; or
(ii) proof of identification and properly executed an
affidavit under section 2.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 13. IC 3-11.7-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.103-2005,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) If the board determines that the affidavit
executed by the provisional voter has not been properly executed, that
the provisional voter is not a qualified voter of the precinct, that the
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144


voter failed to provide proof of identification when required under
IC 3-10-1, IC 3-11-8, or IC 3-11-10-26, or that the provisional voter did
not register to vote at a registration agency under this article on a date
within the registration period, or that the provisional voter failed to
comply with the requirements under IC 3-7-49, the board shall make
the following findings:
(1) The provisional ballot is invalid.
(2) The provisional ballot may not be counted.
(3) The provisional ballot envelope containing the ballots cast by
the provisional voter may not be opened.
(b) If the county election board determines that a provisional ballot
is invalid, a notation shall be made on the provisional ballot envelope:
"Provisional ballot determined invalid".
2026 IN 1148—LS 6670/DI 144